Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 518.175, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. General. (a) In all proceedings for dissolution or legal separation, subsequent to the commencement of the proceeding and continuing thereafter during the minority of the child, the court shall, upon the request of either parent, grant such parenting time on behalf of the child and a parent as will enable the child and the parent to maintain a child to parent relationship that will be in the best interests of the child. new text begin The court shall use a rebuttable presumption that it is in the best interests of the child to protect each individual parent-child relationship by maximizing the child's time with each parent. new text end The court, when issuing a parenting time order, may reserve a determination as to the future establishment or expansion of a parent's parenting time. In that event, the best interest standard set forth in subdivision 5, paragraph (a), shall be applied to a subsequent motion to establish or expand parenting time. (b) If the court finds, after a hearing, that parenting time with a parent is likely to endanger the child's physical, mental, or emotional health or safety or impair the child's emotional development, the court shall restrict parenting time with that parent as to time, place, duration, or supervision and may deny parenting time entirely, as the circumstances warrant. The court shall consider the age of the child and the child's relationship with the parent prior to the commencement of the proceeding. (c) A parent's failure to pay support because of the parent's inability to do so shall not be sufficient cause for denial of parenting time. (d) The court may provide that a law enforcement officer or other appropriate person will accompany a party seeking to enforce or comply with parenting time. (e) Upon request of either party, to the extent practicable an order for parenting time must include a specific schedule for regular parenting time, including the frequency and duration of parenting time and parenting time during holidays, vacations, and school breaks unless parenting time is restricted, denied, or reserved. (f) The court administrator shall provide a form for a pro se motion regarding parenting time disputes, which includes provisions for indicating the relief requested, an affidavit in which the party may state the facts of the dispute, and a brief description of the parenting time expeditor process under section 518.1751. The form may not include a request for a change of custody. The court shall provide instructions on serving and filing the motion. (g) deleted text begin In the absence of other evidencedeleted text end new text begin Unless otherwise agreednew text end , there is a rebuttable presumption that a child must receive a minimum of at least deleted text begin 25deleted text end new text begin 50new text end percent of the parenting time with each parent. new text begin If it is not practicable to award 50 percent of the parenting time to each parent, the court shall maximize parenting time for each parent as close as possible to the 50 percent presumption. new text end For purposes of this paragraph, the percentage of parenting time may be determined by calculating the number of overnights that a child spends with a parent or by using a method other than overnights if the parent has significant time periods on separate days when the child is in the parent's physical custody but does not stay overnight. deleted text begin The court may consider the age of the child in determining whether a child is with a parent for a significant period of time.deleted text end new text begin (h) In a parenting time order, the court must include findings regarding the ability of each parent to comply with the awarded parenting time schedule. new text end new text begin (i) If a court deviates from the parenting time presumption under paragraph (g) and the parties have not otherwise made a parenting time agreement, the court shall make written findings of fact supported by clear and convincing evidence that the court has deviated from the parenting time presumption because: new text end new text begin (1) a parent has a mental illness that was diagnosed by a licensed physician or by a licensed psychologist and the mental illness endangers the safety of the child based on the opinion of the licensed physician or the licensed psychologist treating the parent; new text end new text begin (2) a parent refuses or fails to complete a substance use disorder assessment ordered by a court, or a parent refuses or fails to complete chemical dependency recommendations as ordered by a licensed physician or by a licensed drug or alcohol counselor; new text end new text begin (3) a parent is unable to care for the child 50 percent of the time because of the parent's inability to modify the parent's schedule to accommodate having a child 50 percent of the time. An inability to modify a parent's schedule includes but is not limited to work, school, child care, or medical appointment scheduling conflicts that prevent a parent from maintaining parenting time with a child to accommodate the presumption under this section. A parent's provision of safe alternative care for the child when the parent is not available during the parent's scheduled parenting time is not an inability of a parent to participate in a parenting time schedule under this paragraph; new text end new text begin (4) a parent repeatedly and willfully fails to comply with parenting time awarded pursuant to a temporary order; new text end new text begin (5) the distance required to travel between each parent's residence is so great that it is impractical for each parent to have 50 percent parenting time; new text end new text begin (6) the child has diagnosed medical or educational special needs that cannot be met if the court follows the parenting time presumption; or new text end new text begin (7) of a finding that the child is currently not safe in a parent's care. new text end new text begin (j) In assessing whether to deviate from the parenting time presumption in paragraph (g), the court shall consider that a reduction in a parent's parenting time may impair the parent's ability to parent the child, which may have a negative impact on the child. new text end new text begin (k) If a child does not have a relationship with a parent due to the parent's absence for one year or more with minimal contact or no contact with the child or if the child is one year old or younger, the court may order a gradual increase in parenting time. If the court orders a gradual increase in parenting time, the gradual increase must only be in effect for a period of one year or less, at which time the order must provide for a parenting time schedule based on the parenting time presumption in paragraph (g). new text end new text begin (l) The court shall not limit parenting time for a parent based solely on the age of the child. If the child is five years old or younger at the time that the parenting time schedule is established and the order does not provide for equal parenting time for each parent, the order must include a provision for a possible future modification of the parenting time order. new text end new text begin (m) The court shall not consider the gender of a parent or a parent's marital status or relationship status when making parenting time determinations under this section. new text end new text begin (n) It is not a deviation from the parenting time presumption in paragraph (g) if the court awards parenting time of: new text end new text begin (1) up to 53 percent to one parent and not below 47 percent to the other parent; new text end new text begin (2) less than 50 percent to a parent when there is a finding that domestic abuse, as defined in section 518B.01, has occurred between the parents or between a parent and child; or new text end new text begin (3) less than 50 percent to a parent when that parent is convicted of a qualified domestic violence-related offense, as defined in section 609.02, subdivision 16, when the domestic violence-related offense occurred between the parents or between a parent and child. new text end new text begin (o) When awarding parenting time, the court shall evaluate whether: new text end new text begin (1) one parent has engaged in unwarranted interference between the child and the other parent; new text end new text begin (2) one parent has made false allegations of domestic abuse; and new text end new text begin (3) one parent has chronically denied or minimized the parenting time of the other parent in order to gain advantage in custody matters. new text end